Mississippi, session 2026, HB1461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1) The certificate of death shall be filled out and signed by the physician, the advanced practice registered nurse (APRN), or by the coroner medical examiner in charge of the case. (2)  An APRN licensed under Section 73-15-1 et seq. may complete, sign and file a certificate of death if the APRN was the provider in charge of the patient's care for the illness or condition that resulted in death, or if the APRN is providing coverage for the patient's primary provider. SECTION 2.  Section 41-57-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-57-13.  (1)  Death certificate errors in the recording of personal information of the deceased may be corrected by affidavit of the informant and the funeral director of the funeral home that disposed of the body.  Items in the medical certification or of a medical nature may be amended upon receipt of the specified amendment form from (a) the person originally certifying the information or, if deceased or incapacitated, from the person responsible for the completion of such items, or (b) the State Medical Examiner.  All other amendments to a death certificate require adjudication by a chancery court in the county of residence of the complainant or in any chancery court district in the state if the complainant is a nonresident.  In all such proceedings, the State Department of Health, the State Medical Examiner and the county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator who certified the information shall be made defendants. No death certificate shall be changed or amended by the State Medical Examiner or any county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator after he has resigned or been removed from his office as the State Medical Examiner, county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator. (2)  The local registrar of births and deaths in each county in the state shall, at least monthly, supply the county registrar, the tax assessor and the chairman of the county election commission of each county a list of deaths in the counties of individuals of voting age who have not been previously listed.  Such lists shall include the following information for each deceased person:  full name (as recorded on the death certificate), social security number, date of death, sex, race, age and usual place of residence. (3)  No such payment as is provided for in Section 41-57-11 shall be made by the board of supervisors unless and until the local registrar shall certify that a list of all deaths of individuals of voting age has been filed with the county voting registrar, tax assessor and with the chairman of the county election commission of the last county of residence of the decedent in this state. (4)  In the event that the decedent is a female, who at the time of her death was between the ages of ten (10) and fifty (50) years old, the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, medical examiner, coroner or other official who certifies the decedent's cause of death shall indicate, where appropriately designated, on the death certificate whether (a) the decedent was pregnant at the time of her death; (b) the decedent had given birth within the preceding ninety (90) days; or (c) the decedent had a miscarriage within the preceding ninety (90) days. SECTION 3.  Section 41-61-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-61-63.  (1)  The State Medical Examiner shall: (a)  Provide assistance, consultation and training to county medical examiners, county medical examiner investigators and law enforcement officials. (b)  Keep complete records of all relevant information concerning deaths or crimes requiring investigation by the medical examiners. (c)  Promulgate rules and regulations regarding the manner and techniques to be employed while conducting autopsies; the nature, character and extent of investigations to be made into deaths affecting the public interest to allow a medical examiner to render a full and complete analysis and report; the format and matters to be contained in all reports rendered by the medical examiners; and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of Sections 41-61-51 through 41-61-79. The State Medical Examiner shall make such amendments to these rules and regulations as may be necessary.  All medical examiners, coroners and law enforcement officers shall be subject to such rules. (d)  Cooperate with the crime detection and medical examiner laboratories authorized by Section 45-1-17, the University of Mississippi Medical Center, the Attorney General, law enforcement agencies, the courts and the State of Mississippi. (e)  Promulgate rules and regulations regarding the manner in which county medical examiner investigators are required to enter electronically the information for all deaths that occur in the investigator's county. (2)  In addition, the medical examiners shall: (a)  Upon receipt of notification of a death affecting the public interest, make inquiries regarding the cause and manner of death, reduce the findings to writing and promptly make a full report to the State Medical Examiner on forms prescribed for that purpose.  The medical examiner shall be authorized to inspect and copy the medical reports of the decedent whose death is under investigation.  However, the records copied shall be maintained as confidential so as to protect the doctor/patient privilege.  The medical examiners shall be authorized to request the issuance of subpoenas, through the proper court, for the attendance of persons and for the production of documents as may be required by their investigation. (b)  Complete the medical examiner's portion of the certificate of death within seventy-two (72) hours of assuming jurisdiction over a death, and forward the certificate to the funeral director or to the family.  The medical examiner's portion of the certificate of death shall include the decedent's name, the date and time of death, the cause of death and the certifier's signature.  If determination of the cause and/or manner of death are pending an autopsy or toxicological or other studies, these sections on the certificate may be marked "pending," with amendment and completion to follow the completion of the postmortem studies.  The State Medical Examiner shall be authorized to amend a death certificate; however, the State Medical Examiner is not authorized to change or amend any death certificate after he has resigned or been removed from his office as the State Medical Examiner.  Where an attending physician or advanced practice registered nurse refuses to sign a certificate of death, or in case of any death, the State Medical Examiner or properly qualified designee may sign the death certificate. (c)  Cooperate with other agencies as provided for the State Medical Examiner in subsection (1)(d) of this section. (d)  In all investigations of deaths affecting the public interest where an autopsy will not be performed, obtain or attempt to obtain postmortem blood, urine and/or vitreous fluids. Medical examiners may also obtain rectal temperature measurements, known hair samples, radiographs, gunshot residue/wiping studies, fingerprints, palm prints and other noninvasive studies as the case warrants and/or as directed by the State Medical Examiner. Decisions shall be made in consultation with investigating law enforcement officials and/or the State Medical Examiner.  The cost of all studies not performed by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall be borne by the county.  County medical examiner investigators shall be authorized to obtain these postmortem specimens themselves following successful completion of the death investigation training school. (e)  In all investigations of deaths occurring in the manner specified in subsection (2)(j) of Section 41-61-59, a death investigation shall be performed by the medical examiners in accordance with the child death investigation protocol established by the State Medical Examiner.  The results of the death investigation shall be reported to the State Medical Examiner on forms prescribed for that purpose by the State Medical Examiner and to appropriate authorities, including police and child protective services, within three (3) days of the conclusion of the death investigation. (f)  Electronically report all deaths, and all associated toxicology reports, that occur in the examiner's county to the State Medical Examiner in a manner prescribed by the State Medical Examiner. (3)  The medical examiner shall not use his position or authority to favor any particular funeral home or funeral homes. SECTION 4.  Section 41-41-302, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-41-302. (1)  As used in this section, the term "POLST" means a physician order for life-sustaining treatment, which may also be known as a provider order for life-sustaining treatment.   (2)  An advanced practice registered nurse (APRN) shall have the authority to sign and execute a POLST order for a patient under the nurse's care. (3)  All POLST orders executed in this state shall follow the national best practice guidelines as established by the National POLST Paradigm. This includes, but is not limited to: (a)  Ensuring that the order is voluntary and based on shared decision-making between the provider and the patient (or the patient's legal surrogate); (b)  Using the specialized, standardized form that is easily identifiable and transferable across health care settings; and (c)  Providing clear instructions regarding cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), medical interventions, and artificially administered nutrition. (4) A * * *physician order for sustaining treatment (POST) POLST directing health care in the standardized form provided by this section may be executed by the primary physician of an individual or by the APRN for a patient under the nurse's care, and: (a) The individual, if an adult or emancipated minor with capacity; or (b) The agent, guardian, or surrogate having authority to make health care decisions on behalf of the individual if the individual is: (i) An unemancipated minor; or (ii) An adult or emancipated minor who lacks capacity. ( * * *25)  The * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST shall be executed, implemented, reviewed, and revoked in accordance with the instructions on the form. ( * * *36)  The State Board of Medical Licensure shall promulgate a standardized * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST form in accordance with the provisions in this section, adhering to the sequence in those provisions and using checkboxes to indicate the various alternatives.  The board shall consult with appropriate professional and advocacy organizations in developing the * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST form, including the Mississippi Hospital Association, the Mississippi State Medical Association, Mississippians for Emergency Medical Services, the Mississippi Health Care Association, the Mississippi Independent Nursing Home Association, the Louisiana-Mississippi Hospice and Palliative Care Organization, Disability Rights Mississippi,  Mississippi Right to Life, the Mississippi Bar Association and the Mississippi Section of American Congress of Obstetricians and Gynecologists. The * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST form shall begin with an introductory section containing the name " * * *POST, Physician Orders for Sustaining Treatment POLST, Physician Order for Life-Sustaining Treatment," the patient's name, patient's date of birth, the effective date of the form followed by the statement "Form must be reviewed at least annually.", and containing the statements "HIPAA permits disclosure of * * *POST POLST to other health care professionals as necessary" and "This document is based on this person's current medical condition and wishes and is to be reviewed for potential replacement in the case of a substantial change in either.  Any section not completed indicates preference for full treatment for that section." (a) Section A of the form shall direct provision or withholding of cardiopulmonary resuscitation to the patient when he or she has no pulse and is not breathing by selecting one (1) of the following: (i) Attempt Resuscitation (CPR); or (ii) Do Not Attempt Resuscitation (DNR); and include the statement "When not in cardiopulmonary arrest, follow orders in B, C, and D." (b) Section B of the form shall direct the sustaining treatment when the patient has a pulse or is breathing by selecting one (1) of the following: (i) Full Sustaining Treatment, including the use of intubation, advanced airway interventions, mechanical ventilation, defibrillation or cardio version as indicated, medical treatment, intravenous fluids, and comfort measures.  This option shall include the statement "Transfer to a hospital if indicated. Includes intensive care.  Treatment Plan:  Full treatment including life support measures"; (ii) Limited Interventions, including the use of medical treatment, oral and intravenous medications, intravenous fluids, cardiac monitoring as indicated, noninvasive bi-level positive airway pressure, a bag valve mask, and comfort measures.  This option excludes the use of intubation or mechanical ventilation.  This option shall include the statement "Transfer to a hospital if indicated.  Avoid intensive care.  Treatment Plan: Provide basic medical treatments"; or (iii) Comfort Measures, including keeping the patient clean, warm, and dry; use of medication by any route; positioning, wound care, and other measures to relieve pain and suffering; and the use of oxygen, suction, and manual treatment of airway obstruction as needed for comfort.  This option shall include the statement "Do not transfer to a hospital unless comfort needs cannot be met in the patient's current location (e.g., hip fracture)," and include a space for other instructions. (c) Section C of the form shall direct the use of oral and intravenous antibiotics by selecting one (1) of the following: (i) Antibiotics if life can be sustained; (ii) Determine use or limitation of antibiotics when infection occurs; (iii) Use antibiotics only to relieve pain and discomfort; and include a space for other instructions. (d) Section D of the form, which shall have the heading "Medically Administered Fluids and Nutrition:  Administer oral fluids and nutrition if physically possible," shall include the following options: (i) Directing the administration of nutrition into blood vessels if physically feasible as determined in accordance with reasonable medical judgment by selecting one (1) of the following: 1. Total parenteral nutrition long-term if indicated; 2. Total parenteral nutrition for a defined trial period, which option shall be followed by "Goal:" and a blank line; or 3. No parenteral nutrition; (ii) Directing the administration of nutrition by tube if physically feasible as determined in accordance with reasonable medical judgment by selecting one (1) of the following: 1. Long-term feeding tube if indicated; 2. Feeding tube for a defined trial period, which option shall be followed by "Goal:" and a blank line; or 3. No feeding tube; and shall include a space for other instructions; or (iii) Directing the administration of hydration, if physically feasible as determined in accordance with reasonable medical judgment, by selecting one (1) of the following: 1. Long-term intravenous fluids if indicated; 2. Intravenous fluids for a defined trial period, which option shall be followed by "Goal:" and a blank line; or 3. Intravenous fluids only to relieve pain and discomfort. (e) Section E of the form, which shall have the heading "Patient Preferences as a Basis for this * * *POST POLST Form," shall include the following: (i) A direction to indicate whether or not the patient has an advance health-care directive as defined in Section 41-41-203 and if so, the date of the advance directive's execution, and, a certification that the * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST is in accordance with the advance directive, followed by the printed name, position, and signature of an individual so certifying; (ii) If the patient is an unemancipated minor, an indication of by which one or more of the following directions were given in accordance with Section 41-41-3: 1. Minor's guardian or custodian; 2. Minor's parent; 3. Adult brother or sister of the minor; 4. Minor's grandparent; or 5. Adult who has exhibited special care and concern for minor; and (iii) If the patient is an adult or an emancipated minor, by which one or more of the following directions were given in accordance with Section 41-41-205, 41-41-211 or 41-41-213: 1. Patient; 2. Agent authorized by patient's power of attorney for health care; 3. Guardian of the patient; 4. Surrogate designated by patient; 5. Spouse of patient (if not legally separated); 6. Adult child of the patient; 7. Parent of the patient; 8. Adult brother or sister of the patient; or 9. Adult who has exhibited special care and concern for the patient and is familiar with the patient's values. (f) A signature portion of the form, which shall include lines for the printed name, signature, and date of signing for: (i) The patient's primary physician or the APRN for a patient under the nurse's care; (ii) The individual or individuals described in paragraph (e)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection; and (iii) The health care professional preparing the form, if other than the patient's primary physician or the APRN for a patient under the nurse's care, with contact information. (g) A section entitled "Information for patient or representative of patient named on this form," which shall include the following language: "The * * *POST POLST form is always voluntary and is usually for persons with advanced illness.  * * *POST POLST records your wishes for medical treatment in your current state of health.  Once initial medical treatment is begun and the risks and benefits of further therapy are clear, your treatment wishes may change.  Your medical care and this form can be changed to reflect your new wishes at any time.  However, no form can address all the medical treatment decisions that may need to be made.  An advance health-care directive is recommended for all capable adults and emancipated minors, regardless of their health status.  An advance directive allows you to document in detail your future health care instructions and/or name a health-care agent to speak for you if you are unable to speak for yourself. If this form is for a minor for whom you are authorized to make health-care decisions, you may not direct denial of medical treatment in a manner that would make the minor a "neglected child" under Section 43-21-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, or otherwise violate the child abuse and neglect laws of Mississippi.  In particular, you may not direct the withholding of medically indicated treatment from a disabled infant with life-threatening conditions, as those terms are defined in 42 USCS Section 5106g or regulations implementing it and 42 USCS Section 5106a.". (h) A section entitled "Directions for Completing and Implementing Form," which shall include the following four (4) subdivisions: (i) The first subdivision, entitled "Completing * * *POST POLST," shall have the following language: * * *POST POLST must be reviewed and prepared in consultation with the patient or the patient's representative. * * *POST POLST must be reviewed and signed by a physician, or by the APRN for a patient under the nurse's care, to be valid.  Be sure to document the basis for concluding the patient had or lacked capacity at the time of execution of the form in the patient's medical record.  The signature of the patient or the patient's representative is required; however, if the patient's representative is not reasonably available to sign the original form, a copy of the completed form with the signature of the patient's representative must be placed in the medical record as soon as practicable and "on file" must be written on the appropriate signature on this form. Use of original form is required.  Be sure to send the original form with the patient. There is no requirement that a patient have a * * * POST POLST. (ii) The second subdivision, entitled "Implementing * * * POST POLST," shall have the following language: If a health care provider or facility is unwilling to comply with the orders due to policy or personal objections, the provider or facility must not impede transfer of the patient to another provider or facility willing to implement the orders and must provide at least requested care in the meantime unless, in reasonable medical judgment, denial of requested care would not result in or hasten the patient's death. If a minor protests a directive to deny the minor life-preserving medical treatment, the denial of treatment may not be implemented pending issuance of a judicial order resolving the conflict. (iii) The third subdivision, entitled "Reviewing * * * POST POLST," shall have the following language: This * * *POST POLST must be reviewed at least annually or earlier if; The patient is admitted or discharged from a health care facility; There is a substantial change in the patient's health status; or The patient's treatment preferences change. If * * *POST POLST is revised or becomes invalid, draw a line through Sections A-E and write "VOID" in large letters. (iv) The fourth subdivision, entitled "Revocation of * * *POST POLST," shall have the following language: This * * *POST POLST may be revoked by the patient or the patient's representative. (i) A section entitled "Review of * * *POST POLST," which shall include the following columns and a number of rows determined by the State Board of Medical Licensure: (i) Review Date; (ii) Reviewer and Location of Review; (iii) MD/DO Signature (Required); and (iv) Signature of Patient or Representative (Required). (j) A section entitled "Outcome of Review," which shall include descriptions of the outcome in each row by selecting one (1) of the following: (i) No Change; (ii) FORM VOIDED, new form completed; or (iii) FORM VOIDED, no new form. SECTION 5.  Section 41-41-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-41-303. (1)  A physician, advanced practice registered nurse (APRN) or other health-care provider acting in good faith and in accordance with generally accepted health-care standards applicable to the physician, APRN or health-care provider is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for: (a)  Executing a physician order for life-sustaining treatment (POLST) in compliance with a health-care decision of a person apparently having authority to make a health-care decision for a patient, including a decision to provide, withhold or withdraw health care; (b)  Declining to execute a * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST in compliance with a health-care decision of a person based on a belief that the person then lacked authority; or (c)  Complying with an apparently valid * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST on the assumption that the order was valid when made and has not been revoked or terminated. (2)  A health-care provider or institution that intentionally violates Section 41-41-302 is subject to liability to the aggrieved individual for damages of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or actual damages resulting from the violation, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney's fees. (3)  A person who intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates an individual's * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST or a revocation of a * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST without the individual's consent, or who coerces or fraudulently induces an individual to give, revoke, or not to give a * * *physician order for sustaining treatment POLST, is subject to liability to that individual for damages of * * * Twenty‑five Hundred Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) or actual damages resulting from the action, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney's fees. (4)  On petition of a patient, the patient's agent, guardian, or surrogate, a health-care provider or institution involved with the patient's care, or surrogate for the patient as described in Section 41-41-211(2) or (3), any court of competent jurisdiction may enjoin or direct a health-care decision related to a physician order for scope of treatment, or order other equitable relief.  A proceeding under this section shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. SECTION 6.  Section 73-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-5.  (1) "Board" means the Mississippi Board of Nursing. (2)  The "practice of nursing" by a registered nurse means the performance for compensation of services which requires substantial knowledge of the biological, physical, behavioral, psychological and sociological sciences and of nursing theory as the basis for assessment, diagnosis, planning, intervention and evaluation in the promotion and maintenance of health; management of individuals' responses to illness, injury or infirmity; the restoration of optimum function; or the achievement of a dignified death.  "Nursing practice" includes, but is not limited to, administration, teaching, counseling, delegation and supervision of nursing, and execution of the medical regimen, including the administration of medications and treatments prescribed by any licensed or legally authorized physician or dentist.  The foregoing shall not be deemed to include acts of medical diagnosis or prescriptions of medical, therapeutic or corrective measures, except as may be set forth by rules and regulations promulgated and implemented by the Mississippi Board of Nursing. (3)  "Clinical nurse specialist practice" by a certified clinical nurse specialist means the delivery of advanced practice nursing care to individuals or groups using advanced diagnostic and assessment skills to manage and improve the health status of individuals and families; diagnose human responses to actual or potential health problems; plan for health promotion, disease prevention, and therapeutic intervention in collaboration with the patient or client; implement therapeutic interventions based on the nurse specialist's area of expertise and within the scope of advanced nursing practice, including, but not limited to, direct patient care, counseling, teaching, collaboration with other licensed health care providers; and, coordination of health care as necessary and appropriate and evaluation of the effectiveness of care. (4)  "Advanced nursing practice" means, in addition to the practice of professional nursing, the performance of advanced-level nursing approved by the board which, by virtue of graduate education and experience are appropriately performed by an advanced practice registered nurse.  "Practice of nursing" by an advanced practice registered nurse means the delivery of expanded clinical resources, including, but not limited to, the following:  (a) the performance of acts that are appropriate to the nurse's specific specialty and education; * * *The advanced practice registered nurse may (b) authority to diagnose, treat and manage medical conditions * * *. This may include prescriptive authority; (c) authority to prescribe medications and treatments as identified by the board * * *.; and (d) authority to sign, certify, or endorse documents as required by law, including death certificates and provider orders for life-sustaining treatment (POLST).  Advanced practice registered nurses must practice in a collaborative/consultative relationship with a physician or dentist with an unrestricted license to practice in the State of Mississippi and advanced nursing must be performed within the framework of a standing protocol or practice guidelines, as appropriate. (5)  The "practice of nursing" by a licensed practical nurse means the performance for compensation of services requiring basic knowledge of the biological, physical, behavioral, psychological and sociological sciences and of nursing procedures which do not require the substantial skill, judgment and knowledge required of a registered nurse.  These services are performed under the direction of a registered nurse or a licensed physician or licensed dentist and utilize standardized procedures in the observation and care of the ill, injured and infirm; in the maintenance of health; in action to safeguard life and health; and in the administration of medications and treatments prescribed by any licensed physician or licensed dentist authorized by state law to prescribe. On a selected basis, and within safe limits, the role of the licensed practical nurse shall be expanded by the board under its rule-making authority to more complex procedures and settings commensurate with additional preparation and experience. (6)  A "license" means an authorization to practice nursing as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse designated herein. (7)  A "registered nurse" is a person who is licensed or holds the privilege to practice under the provisions of this article and who practices nursing as defined herein.  "RN" is the abbreviation for the title of Registered Nurse. (8)  A "licensed practical nurse" is a person who is licensed or holds the privilege to practice under this article and who practices practical nursing as defined herein.  "LPN" is the abbreviation for the title of Licensed Practical Nurse. (9)  A "registered nurse in clinical practice" is one who functions in any health care delivery system which provides nursing services. (10)  A "clinical nurse specialist" is a person who is licensed or holds the privilege to practice under this article in this state to practice professional nursing and who in this state practices advanced nursing as defined herein.  "CNS" is the abbreviation for the title of Clinical Nurse Specialist. (11)  An "advanced practice registered nurse" is a person who is licensed or holds the privilege to practice under this article and who is certified in advanced practice registered nurse or specialized nursing practice and includes certified registered nurse midwives, certified registered nurse anesthetists and certified nurse practitioners.  "CNM" is the abbreviation for the title of Certified Nurse Midwife, "CRNA" is the abbreviation for the title of Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist.  "CNP" is the abbreviation for the title of Certified Nurse Practitioner. (12)  A "nurse educator" is a registered nurse who meets the criteria for faculty as set forth in a state-accredited program of nursing for registered nurses, or a state-approved program of nursing for licensed practical nurses, and who functions as a faculty member. (13)  A "consumer representative" is a person representing the interests of the general public, who may use services of a health agency or health professional organization or its members but who is neither a provider of health services, nor employed in the health services field, nor holds a vested interest in the provision of health services at any level, nor has an immediate family member who holds vested interests in the provision of health services at any level. (14)  "Privilege to practice" means the multistate licensure privilege to practice nursing in the state as described in the Nurse Licensure Compact provided for in Section 73-15-201. (15)  "Licensee" is a person who has been issued a license to practice nursing in the state or who holds the privilege to practice nursing in the state. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.